Louisiana, session 2026, SB134.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:81.1(A)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81.1. Child sexual abuse materials
A.(1) * * *
(3)(a) When a person who is under the age of seventeen years violates
Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section by either of the following acts, the provisions
of R.S. 14:81.1.1 relative to the crime of "sexting" shall govern the offense,
unless the person committed the offense with the intent to obtain anything of
value, secure a privilege or advantage, or harass or cause emotional distress to
any person:
(i) Using a computer or telecommunication device to knowingly and
voluntarily transmit an indecent visual depiction of himself.
(ii) Receiving or possessing an indecent visual depiction of a person that
was transmitted by the person depicted in the image.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 134 ENROLLED
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, "indecent visual depiction" shall
have the same meaning as provided in R.S. 14:81.1.1.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.